Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 9. Old Age Assistance

§ 43-9-1.
Statewide system of old age assistance.

For the purpose of providing for aged persons in need, a statewide system of old age assistance is hereby established and shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of this state to operate with due regard to the varying conditions and cost of living, to be financed by state appropriations therefor, and to be administered by the Department of Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services, as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7214; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 2008, ch. 541, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 43-9-3.
Short title.

This chapter and Chapter 1 of this title shall be known as the “Mississippi Old Age Security Law” and shall be cited as such.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7215; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-5.
Definitions.

When used herein, the term “department” means the State Department of Public Welfare; “commissioner” means the state commissioner of public welfare; “board” means the state board of public welfare; “applicant” means a person applying for assistance under this chapter; “recipient” means a person receiving aid under the provisions of this chapter; “assistance” means money payments including vendor payments made to or in behalf of needy aged persons hereunder; “county department” means the county board of public welfare, the director of public welfare, and such other personnel as may be authorized in said department by the State Department of Public Welfare.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7216; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1962, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 503, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 1970).

§ 43-9-7.
Eligibility for assistance to the needy aged.

Assistance shall be given under this chapter to any person who:

Has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years;

Has resided in the state for one (1) year immediately preceding his application and such residence shall not have been established solely or in part for the purpose of enabling the applicant to come within the provisions of this chapter;

Resides in the county in which application is made;

Has not sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health;

Is not an inmate of or being maintained by any county, municipal, state, or national institution at the time of receiving assistance except as a patient in a public medical institution, or is not a patient in any institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases, or is not a patient in any medical institution as a result of having been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis; in the event the federal Social Security Act or other appropriate federal statutes are so amended as to permit funds appropriated by congress to be used for assistance to aged persons who are inmates of public institutions, then being an inmate of any such institution shall not disqualify any such person for assistance. An inmate of a public institution may, however, make application for such assistance but the assistance if granted shall not begin until after he ceases to be an inmate;

Has not made an assignment or transfer of property so as to render himself eligible for assistance under this chapter at any time within two (2) years immediately prior to the filing of an application for assistance pursuant to the provisions hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7225; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1938, ch. 361; Laws, 1940, ch. 289; Laws, 1940, 298; Laws, 1948, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 439, § 1.

§ 43-9-9.
Amount of assistance.

The amount of assistance for the needy aged which any recipient shall receive shall be determined by the county department with due regard to the resources, income, and necessary expenditures of the individual and the conditions existing in each case and in accordance with the rules and regulations made by the state department, and shall be sufficient when added to all other income and support of the recipient to provide him with a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health or special needs as permitted under the federal Social Security Act. However, the state department of public welfare may disregard the amount of monthly income of the recipient as specified by the federal Social Security Act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7226; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1957, Ex Sess ch. 23; Laws, 1960, ch. 440; Laws, 1962, ch. 562, § 2; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 1968, ch. 562, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved July 30, 1968).

§ 43-9-11.
Application for assistance to the needy aged.

Application for assistance under this chapter shall be made to the county welfare agent of the county in which the applicant resides. The application shall be in writing or reduced to writing in the manner and upon the form prescribed by the state department. Such application shall contain such information as may be prescribed by the state department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7227; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-13.
Investigation of applications.

Whenever a county welfare agent receives an application for assistance under this chapter, an investigation and record shall promptly be made of the circumstances of the applicant to ascertain the facts supporting the application made under this chapter and such other information as may be required by the rules of the state board.

The county department and the state department shall have the power to conduct examinations, subpoena witnesses, require the attendance of witnesses, and the production of books, records and papers, and make application to the circuit court of the county to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of such books, records and papers. The county board and such officers and employees as are designated by the state commissioner may also administer oaths and affirmations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7228; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-15.
Granting of assistance.

Upon completion of the investigation, the county department shall determine in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department, whether the applicant is eligible for assistance under the provisions of this chapter, the amount of assistance he shall receive, and the date upon which such assistance shall begin. All checks for such assistance shall be mailed by the state department or county welfare office to the recipients at their postoffice address. The director of the state department shall determine whether such checks shall be mailed by the state department or by the county welfare office.

It shall be the duty of the state department insofar as is practicable to provide assistance to eligible persons, who, due to limitations of available funds have not been placed upon the assistance rolls, as soon as practicable after additional funds become available to the department and prior to making a general increase in assistance grants to persons already on said assistance rolls. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to bar or limit any county department of public welfare from granting individual increases in the amount of assistance to recipients based upon their individual needs. The state department shall, as soon as made possible by the availability of additional funds, take steps to eliminate all waiting lists. The state department or the office of public welfare of the various counties shall notify each applicant concerning the action taken on his or her application for assistance, and if the application for assistance is denied, the applicant shall be notified and given the reasons for such denial, and the lack of money shall not constitute a reason for such denial.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7229; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1944, ch. 291, § 1, eff June 30, 1944.

§ 43-9-17.
Payment for benefit of recipient.

If the recipient or applicant is found incapable of taking care of himself or his money, payments may be paid to any person, firm, corporation, association, institution or agency designated to receive it by order of the county department of his county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7230; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1962, ch. 562, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1962).

§ 43-9-19.
Assistance not assignable.

No assistance given under this chapter shall be transferable or assignable, at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this chapter shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7231; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-21.
Appeal to the State Department of Public Welfare.

The county department shall at once report to the state department its decision upon each application. If an application is not acted upon by the county department within thirty (30) days after the filing of the application, or is denied or revoked, the applicant may appeal to the state department in the manner and form prescribed by rules and regulations. The state department shall upon receipt of such an appeal give the applicant an opportunity for a fair hearing. The state department may also, upon its own motion, review any decision of a county department and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the county department within a reasonable time.

The state department may make such additional investigation as it may deem necessary and shall make such decision as to the granting of assistance and the amount of assistance to be granted the applicant as in its opinion is justified and in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. All decisions of the state department shall be binding upon the county department involved and shall be complied with by such county department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7232; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-23.
Periodic reconsideration and changes in amount of assistance.

All assistance grants made under this chapter shall be reconsidered as frequently as may be required by the rules and regulations of the state board. After such further investigation, the amount of assistance may be changed or assistance may be entirely withdrawn if the state commissioner or county department finds that the recipient’s circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action. The county department may at any time cancel and revoke assistance for cause and it may for cause suspend assistance for such period as it may deem proper. Whenever assistance is thus withdrawn, revoked, suspended or in any way changed, the county department shall at once report to the state department such decision together with the record of its investigation. All such decisions shall be subject to review by the state commissioner as provided in Section 43-9-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7233; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-25.
No fees to be paid.

No person shall make any charge or receive any fee for representing any applicant or recipient of assistance in any proceeding hereunder except as to criminal proceedings brought pursuant to Section 43-9-27; or with respect to any application whether such fee or charge be paid by the applicant or recipient or by any other person or persons. Any violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor and be punishable as provided in Section 43-9-27.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7235; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-27.
Fraudulent acts.

Whoever obtains, or attempts, or aids, or abets any person to obtain by means of a wilfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or other fraudulent device;

Assistance to which he is not entitled; or

Assistance greater than that to which he is justly entitled, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon the conviction thereof shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or be imprisoned for not more than three (3) months, or be both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court. In assessing the penalty, the court shall take into consideration the amount of money fraudulently received.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7236; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-29.
Recovery from recipient’s estate for false representation.

On the death of any recipient, double the total amount of assistance paid to such recipient under this chapter shall be allowed as a claim against the estate of such person if it is found that such recipient has obtained funds by false representation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7234; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-31.
Limitations of chapter.

All assistance granted under this chapter shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to the provisions of any amending or repealing law that may hereafter be passed. No recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of his assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7237; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-33.
Receipt and disposition of federal and other funds.

The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to receive on behalf of the state, and to execute all instruments incidental thereto, federal or other funds to be used for payments of assistance herein provided, and to place all such funds in a special account to the credit of the “state department of public welfare,” which said funds shall be expended by the department for the purposes and under the provisions of this chapter, and shall be paid out by the state treasurer as funds appropriated to carry out the provisions of this chapter are paid out by him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7239; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-35.
Disbursement of funds; how made.

The state department shall issue all checks for assistance to person qualifying for aid under the provisions of this chapter. All such checks shall be drawn upon funds made available to the state department of public welfare by the state auditor, upon requisition of the commissioner, approved by the state board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7240; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1979, ch. 468, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-9-37.
Limitation of assistance and administrative cost.

The total amount of assistance granted under the provisions of this chapter and the expenses incurred thereunder shall not exceed the amounts of funds appropriated therefor by the legislature, together with any funds received from the federal government or other sources for the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 1 of this title. The cost of administering this chapter and Chapter 1 of this title shall not exceed the funds appropriated by the state legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7241; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1966, ch. 607, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 487, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1973).

§ 43-9-39.
Litigation.

No suit shall be maintained in any court for the purpose of compelling an award of assistance or to enforce payment of any award of assistance made under the provisions of this chapter. Awards made hereunder shall in no case create any vested or other rights for assistance in the recipients.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7243; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-41.
Construction of law.

This chapter and Chapter 1 of this title are supplementary to and in aid of any and all welfare laws now in force in Mississippi which are not directly in conflict herewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7244; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-43.
Reservation of right to amend or repeal old age security law.

The Legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of the Mississippi Old Age Security Law at any time, and there shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal. All the rights, benefits, or immunities conferred by said law or by acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the legislature to amend or repeal said law at any time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7246; Laws, 1940, ch. 298.

§ 43-9-45.
Termination of federal assistance program as ipso facto repeal.

The Mississippi Old Age Security Law is continued in force in pursuance of Public Law 92-603, 92nd Congress, under Title III thereof establishing supplemental security income for the aged, blind and disabled; and under Title VI thereof providing grants to the several states for services to the aged, blind or disabled to help needy individuals who are sixty-five (65) years of age or over, are blind, or are disabled to attain or retain capability for self-support or self-care under plans approved by the secretary of health, education and welfare, for services to the aged, blind or disabled; to continue the administration of aid to families with dependent children, pursuant to Title IV, federal Social Security Act, and Sections 43-17-1 through 43-17-25; to determine the eligibility of needy persons for food stamps from the U. S. Department of Agriculture or other federal agency, thus enabling the state to make more adequate provisions for needy aged, blind or disabled persons and for families with dependent children by reason of said federal grants therein provided, the state being unable financially to provide such services and assistance without such federal aid. Therefore, in the event that Public Law 92-603, 92nd Congress, or Title IV, federal Social Security Act, should be finally adjudged invalid, or in the event that the federal grants-in-aid provided thereunder should be substantially reduced below fifty percent (50%), then and in either of such events, and upon public proclamation of the governor, the Mississippi Old Age Security Law shall ipso facto be thereby repealed and rendered null and void.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7247; Laws, 1936, ch. 175; Laws, 1940, ch. 298; Laws, 1973, ch. 489, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 508, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 350, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 43-9-47.
Authority of municipality or county to match federal funds.

The governing authority of any municipality or county of the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to expend such sums as it deems necessary and desirable to match federal funds for any assistance program for aged persons in the State of Mississippi. The governing authority of any municipality or county is authorized to make a voluntary contribution to any such assistance program for aged persons.

The sums expended under this section may be paid from any available funds of the municipality or county to any agency, project, grantee or program approved or sponsored by the Mississippi Council on Aging.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 370, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1979).